Hawaii statutes.
§501-84 Certificates, when two or more
owners. Where two or more persons are registered owners under any tenancy,
one certificate shall be issued for the whole land. Any conveyance of fee
simple interest in registered land shall be recorded with the assistant
registrar, who shall note the same on the certificate, cancel all the
certificates affecting the whole land, and issue a new certificate to reflect
all the owners of the whole land. [L 1903, c 56, §43; RL 1925, §3233; RL 1935,
§5043; RL 1945, §12643; RL 1955, §342-44; HRS §501-84; gen ch 1985; am L 1988,
c 346, §4; am L 1993, c 18, §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next